Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,120
Judge; salary; source of payment.

The salary of a judge of a separate juvenile court shall be as provided in section 24-301.01 and shall be paid out of the General Fund of the state.

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 7, p. 685;

Laws 1965, c. 110, § 2, p. 434;

Laws 1974, LB 228, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 373, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 43-234;

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 77.